Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 37. Streets, Parks and Other Public Property

§ 21-37-1.
Municipal buildings.

The governing authorities of every municipality may construct, erect, purchase and equip a suitable, convenient, and creditable city, town or village hall, necessary schools, fire and police stations, and all necessary buildings for the offices and court of the municipality, for the meetings of the governing authorities, and for such other purposes, including public meetings of the citizens, as may be designated by ordinance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 2952, 3005; 1906, §§ 3343, 3403; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5840, 5933; 1930, §§ 2419, 2541; 1942, § 3374-106; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 106, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-3.
Streets, sidewalks, sewers and parks.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to exercise full jurisdiction in the matter of streets, sidewalks, sewers, and parks; to open and lay out and construct the same; and to repair, maintain, pave, sprinkle, adorn, and light the same.

Section 63-3-208, shall govern the use of electric personal assistive mobility devices (as defined in Section 63-3-103) on streets and sidewalks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2947; 1906, § 3338; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5835; 1930, § 2414; 1942, § 3374-129; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 129; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 21-37-4.
Governing authorities of municipalities to maintain roads, driveways, parking lots and grounds of public schools located within municipal corporate boundaries.

The governing authorities of any municipality, in their discretion, may grade, gravel, shell, overlay, repair and maintain gravel, shell, asphalt or concrete roads, driveways and parking lots and grounds of public schools located within the corporate boundaries of the municipality. Before engaging in such work, the governing authorities shall spread upon their minutes, the written request of the school board for the work, the written approval of the governing authorities for the work and the specific location of the road, driveway, parking lot or school grounds to be worked.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 21-37-5.
Sidewalks.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to cause sidewalks to be constructed and maintained, to determine the material, plans, specifications and grades of the same, and to levy and collect taxes, by special assessment, for the payment of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2944; Laws, 1906, § 3335; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5832; 1930, § 2411; 1942, § 3374-126: Laws, 1950, ch 491, § 126, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-6.
Installation of ramps at municipal crosswalks.

Every municipality shall install ramps at crosswalks, in both business and residential areas, when making new installations of sidewalks, curbs or gutters, or improving or replacing existing sidewalks, curbs or gutters, so as to make the transition from street to sidewalk easily negotiable for physically handicapped persons in wheelchairs and for other persons who may have difficulty in making the required step up or down from curb level to street level.

The term “ramps” as used herein means a sloping asphalt or concrete surface, from the level of the sidewalk or curb to the level of the street at curbside, extending outward and downward from the curb to the street for such a distance, at such an angle, and at such a width as will facilitate the movement up and down such ramps of persons in wheelchairs or persons who have difficulty in stepping up or down between curb level and street level.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 326, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 1975).

§ 21-37-7.
Closing streets.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to close and vacate any street or alley, or any portion thereof. No street or alley or any portion thereof shall be closed or vacated, however, except upon due compensation being first made to the abutting landowners upon such street or alley for all damages sustained thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2945; 1906, § 3336; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5833; 1930, § 2412; 1942, § 3374-127; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 127, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-9.
Railroad crossings.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to regulate the crossings of railways, and to provide precautions and prescribe rules regulating the same. Said authorities shall have the power and authority to make any other and further provisions, rules and regulations to prevent accidents at crossings and on the tracks of railroads, and to prevent fires from engines. Said authorities shall have the power and authority to require railroad companies to erect viaducts over or gates across their tracks at the crossing of streets.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2974; 1906, § 3369; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5866; 1930, § 2447; Laws, § 3374-152; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 152, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-11.
Lights and lamp posts.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to provide for the lighting of streets, parks and public grounds, and the erection of lamps and lamp posts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2964; 1906, § 3360; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5857; 1930, § 2437; 1942, § 3374-146; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 146, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-13.
Municipal piers, pavilions, and bath houses.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to own, operate, and regulate, for public recreation and pleasure purposes, on any tidewaters or navigable streams within or on the border of the municipal limits, piers, pavilions, bath houses, and other like appropriate structures, either by the use of streets or public landings of the municipality or landings purchased or procured for the purpose. Said municipal governing authorities are authorized to issue municipal bonds for the purpose of the acquisition and construction of the aforesaid improvements, such bonds to be issued under the general statutes of the state as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2430; 1942, § 3374-142; Laws, 1928, ch. 189; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 142, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-15.
Harbors, wharves, and docks.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to construct all needful improvements in the harbor; to control, guide, or deflect the current of a river; to repair and regulate public wharves and docks; to charge and collect levee rates and wharfage on firewood, lumber, timber, logs, shingles, staves, posts, laths, and other articles brought to the port of such municipality; and to set aside or lease portions of the wharf for special purposes. However, a permit to use any portion of a wharf or a lease of the same shall not be granted for a term exceeding twenty-five years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2953; 1906, § 3344; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5841; 1930, § 2420; 1942, § 3374-134; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 134, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-17.
Curb markets.

The governing authorities shall have the power to establish and maintain, and to provide for the governing and regulation of curb markets. When such municipality owns such curb market, it shall have the power to fix the rental value thereof, and the stalls and booths therein. However, no municipality shall prohibit the producer of meats and other foodstuffs from selling his produce to consumers in any quantity that seller and buyer may agree upon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2935; 1906, § 3326; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5823; 1930, § 2403; 1942, § 3374-121; Laws, 1916, ch. 223; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 121, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-19.
Public library.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to maintain one or more libraries for public use, and to regulate the use thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2965; 1906, § 3361; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5858; 1930, § 2438; 1942, § 3374-147; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 147, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-20.
Contributions to public library outside corporate limits by municipality without public library.

The governing authorities of any municipality which has no public library located within its corporate limits, in their discretion, may make contributions from any available funds of the municipality for the support, upkeep and maintenance of any public library which is located outside of the corporate limits of the municipality and which provides services to a public junior college or state institution of higher learning.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 414, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 21-37-21.
Public cemeteries; cemetery board of trustees authorized in certain municipalities.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to maintain, repair, and enlarge all of the public cemeteries owned or controlled by such municipalities, within or without the municipal limits, at the expense of the treasury of such municipality.

The governing authorities of a municipality, in its discretion, may maintain and repair any abandoned public or private nonprofit cemetery located within the corporate boundaries of the municipality. The expense of the maintenance of an abandoned public or private nonprofit cemetery may be paid from any available municipal funds. For the purposes of this section, the term “public or private nonprofit cemetery” includes an abandoned community, religious or fraternal cemetery; however, the term does not include family burial grounds or a for-profit perpetual care cemetery that is subject to Sections 41-43-31 through 41-43-57. “Abandoned cemetery” means a cemetery which shows signs of neglect, including, without limitation, the unchecked growth of vegetation, repeated and unchecked acts of vandalism, or the disintegration of grave markers or boundaries and for which no person can be found who is legally responsible and financially capable of the upkeep of such cemetery.

Should there be situated wholly within the corporate limits of any municipality a cemetery which, because of age, abandonment of graves by private owners, or for other good cause, is not being properly maintained, and thereby becomes detrimental to the public health and welfare, and should the governing authorities of that municipality determine that it is to the best interest of the municipality that the municipality assume the maintenance of such cemetery, then such governing authorities shall have the power and they are hereby authorized to acquire title to such cemetery by gift, purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise and are authorized to thereafter maintain, repair, enlarge, fence or otherwise improve such cemetery.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population in excess of seven thousand five hundred (7,500) according to the latest available federal census and being located in a county having an area in excess of eight hundred twenty-five (825) square miles which is traversed by a link of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, may, in its discretion, appoint a cemetery board of trustees of not less than five (5) nor more than seven (7) members to serve for staggered terms of office with full power and authority to administer and operate its cemetery, including but not limited to authority for the establishment of a fund, from a portion of the proceeds from the sale of cemetery lots, to be held in trust and invested by the trustees to the end of insuring perpetual care and maintenance of the cemetery with the least possible tax levies. The municipal governing authorities and the trustees are authorized and empowered to promulgate and adopt reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, deemed essential in carrying out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-165; Laws, 1944, ch. 212; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 165; Laws, 1956, ch. 402; Laws, 1962, ch. 544, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1962); Laws, 2019, ch. 359, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 21-37-23.
Parking facilities for motor vehicles; establishment and operation authorized.

The governing authorities of any municipality shall have the power and authority, in their discretion, to establish and construct municipal parking facilities for motor vehicles belonging to members of the general public, and to rent, lease, purchase, or otherwise acquire the necessary lands and property for the establishment or construction of such facilities, in any manner now authorized by law for the acquisition of land and property for public purposes. All acts and things heretofore done and performed by any municipality of this state in the securing, establishing and construction of public parking lots within the limits of said municipality are hereby ratified and confirmed.

Such municipal governing authorities are empowered to operate and prescribe rules, regulations and rates for the use and operation of such parking facility. Such municipal governing authorities are empowered to employ, fix, and pay the compensation of necessary operating personnel. Such municipal governing authorities are empowered to rent, lease, or sell such facility at such price, but in no case at less than an amount sufficient to repay the cost thereof to the municipality, and on such terms as may be reasonable, but in no case at less than amounts sufficient to service and retire any bonds or notes issued in connection therewith, and conditioned that it shall continue for a specified period of time to be operated as a parking facility for the use of the public, subject to such rules, regulations and rates as may be prescribed by the municipality. No commercial enterprise activities other than the parking of motor vehicles shall be authorized by any municipality on the property comprising any part of such parking facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-169; Laws, 1946, ch. 414; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 169; Laws, 1956, ch. 399; Laws, 1958, ch. 515.

§ 21-37-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, 2nd Ex Sess., ch. 30, § 7, effective from and after passage (approved Sept. 3, 2010.)

§21-37-25. [Codes, 1942, § 3374-169; Laws, 1946, ch. 414; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 169; Laws, 1956, ch. 399; Laws, 1958, ch. 515.]

§ 21-37-27.
Parking facilities for motor vehicles; funding.

For the purpose of securing funds to carry out Section 21-37-23, the governing authorities of such municipality are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to issue bonds or negotiable notes for the purpose of acquiring land and property for a municipal parking facility, and also for owning, erecting, building, establishing, operating and maintaining such facility, and to remodel or repair the same. Such bonds or notes shall be issued in an amount not to exceed the limitation now or hereafter imposed by law, and shall be issued in all respects, including interest rate, maturities and other details, as is now or may hereafter be provided by general law regulating the issuance of bonds or notes by corporate authorities of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-169; Laws, 1946, ch. 414; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 169; Laws, 1956, ch. 399; Laws, 1958, ch. 515.

§ 21-37-29.
Parking meters.

The governing authorities of any municipality in this state are hereby authorized and empowered to purchase, lease or otherwise acquire, and to install and maintain parking meters for the regulation of the parking of vehicles on the municipal streets. When such parking meters are installed and operated by any municipality, the governing authorities thereof shall have the power to prescribe, by ordinance, reasonable rules and regulations for the use and operation of same, and to provide and prescribe penalties for the violation of such rules and regulations. Such governing authorities may also fix, prescribe, and collect fees for the use of the parking space adjacent to any such meters and to require that such fee shall be paid by the deposit of the appropriate coin or coins in such meters.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-170; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 170; Laws, 1956, ch. 400.

§ 21-37-31.
Advertising signs on parking meters.

The governing authorities of any municipality, excepting those in counties bordering on the Gulf of Mexico with a population of more than 80,000, are hereby authorized and empowered to permit the placing of advertising signs upon parking meters or parking meter posts and to contract with any individual or company for the rental or lease thereof, as they may find advantageous to the municipality. The signs shall be placed in compliance with rules and regulations set out by the governing authorities of the municipality, and shall be placed in such manner so as to not obstruct the view of the street, the operation of the meters, or endanger the cars or the drivers thereof parking in front of or near the meters, or pedestrians using the sidewalks upon which the meters are located. The governing authorities shall require any person placing advertising signs upon parking meters or parking meter posts to enter into such contracts of insurance as may be necessary to protect the municipality or any person from any loss or damage caused by the presence of the advertising signs. All monies received by the municipality pursuant to the contract of lease or rental entered into shall be placed in the general fund of the city and expended for such purposes as may be authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-170.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 374, § 1.

§ 21-37-32.
Municipalities authorized to delegate authority for enforcement of parking regulations.

A municipality, by ordinance duly spread upon its minutes, may delegate to an appropriate private enterprise with whom the municipality contracts all or part of the authority to enforce any ordinance concerning the regulation of parking within the confines of the municipality or any part thereof, including, but not limited to, penalties for violations, deadlines for the payment of fines and late payment penalties for fines not paid when due. The delegating ordinance may also provide that a summons or parking citation for the violation may be issued by a uniformed law enforcement officer, uniformed law enforcement employee or by uniformed personnel employed by the delegate serving under contract with the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 572, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2006.).

§ 21-37-33.
Park commission; election and removal of park commissioners; advisory park and recreation commission.

The governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to create a park commission, and to elect not less than three (3) nor more than seven (7) members thereof, who shall be known as “park commissioners” of such municipality to manage and control all of the parks, playgrounds and swimming pools maintained and established in such municipality. Said park commissioners shall be qualified electors of the municipality or the county where the municipality is located and shall not hold any other municipal or county office of honor or profit. They shall receive such compensation as may be allowed by the governing authorities of such municipality. The terms of office of the commissioners, authorized to be elected hereunder shall be one (1) for one (1) year, one (1) for two (2) years, and so on for the number of members of such park commission, and thereafter the term of each commissioner shall be for a number of years as there are members of said commission. Said governing authorities shall have the power to remove any member of such commission for inefficiency or incompetency, or for any other cause.

Provided, however, the governing authorities of any municipality which has been organized under the provisions of Title 21, Chapter 8, Mississippi Code of 1972, are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to create an advisory park and recreation commission which shall serve as an advisory board to said governing authorities on all such matters in the municipality. The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governing authorities, and in those municipalities which have been divided into five (5) wards, the commission shall consist of not less than five (5) nor more than seven (7) members; in those municipalities which have been divided into seven (7) wards, the commission shall consist of not less than seven (7) nor more than nine (9) members; in those municipalities which have been divided into nine (9) wards, the commission shall consist of nine (9) members; and at least one (1) of the members of the commission shall be a resident of each of the wards of the municipality. Appointment of members of the commission by the governing authorities under this paragraph shall be made by the mayor with the confirmation of an affirmative vote of a majority of the city council present and voting at any meeting. The governing authorities of said municipality shall have vested in them all the powers and duties of a park commission as provided by law and shall be the successor in title to all real and personal property held by the park commission in existence under the previous form of government and shall be the successor to all contracts to which said previous commission was a party. The commissioners shall serve in the manner, for such term, and with such powers as said governing authorities may prescribe by ordinance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-158, 3374-161; Laws, 1946, ch. 258, §§ 1, 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 158, 161; Laws, 1954, ch. 347; Laws, 1982, ch. 363; Laws, 1988, ch. 524; Laws, 2007, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 21-37-35.
Park commission; funding.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a park commission shall appropriate and pay to such park commissioners annually such funds as may be necessary, in the opinion of such governing authorities, to properly operate and maintain said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools. All funds in the hands of the park commission shall be placed in the municipal depository and shall be considered municipal funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-159; Laws, 1946, ch. 258, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 159, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-37.
Park commissioner; powers and duties of commissioners.

The park commissioners shall elect one (1) of their numbers to serve as treasurer of the park commission, and he shall give bond in such amount as the governing authorities of the municipality shall require. Such bond shall be payable to the municipality.

The park commissioners shall have the authority to make such bylaws for the holding and conducting of their meetings and such other regulations as they may deem necessary for the safe, economic, and efficient management of such parks, playgrounds and swimming pools, and for the providing of wholesome and healthful recreation to all the citizens of such municipality. The park commissioners are authorized to elect such other officers and appoint such employees as may be necessary to maintain the said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools efficiently, and they shall have entire control and management of the said parks, playgrounds, and swimming pools, together with all property connected or in anyway appertaining to the same. The park commissioners shall have the authority to employ a park superintendent or manager, who shall have actual charge of said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools, and the enforcement and execution of all the rules, regulations and the direction of all programs and festivities, and the operation of all devices for recreation installed therein. They shall have the right to fix the salary or wage of all employees and to direct them in the discharge of their duties. They shall have the right to discharge employees, when found inefficient or for other good cause. They shall have the power to make and collect rates for use of the swimming pool and for the use of any other amusement device that may be installed in said playground, as well as the leasing of concessions or privileges for the sale of cold drinks, confections, popcorn, peanuts or other such articles, or such commission may operate such business. They are authorized to insure all property against loss by fire and tornado and to carry property damage or other miscellaneous casualty insurance, as in the discretion of said commission may be deemed proper, and pay premiums therefor out of the funds appropriated by the said governing authorities of the municipality or the revenues derived in the operation of such parks, playgrounds and swimming pools. They shall report quarterly to the governing authorities of the municipality all their doings and transactions of any kind whatsoever, and shall make a complete statement of the financial condition of such park commission at the end of each quarter. They shall annually make a detailed statement covering the entire management and operation of the said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools, and may make any recommendations which they may have for the further development of such parks, playgrounds and swimming pools. They shall purchase all supplies for said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools in the manner now provided by law for the purchase of such supplies by the governing authorities of such municipality, and shall issue vouchers in payment therefor. The park commissioners shall advertise for competitive bids in the purchase of its supplies in the manner and in the form as may be required of the governing authorities of such municipalities, and they shall make and keep full and proper books and records of all purchases and shall submit them in their quarterly and annual reports to the governing authorities of such municipality. The park commission shall have full jurisdiction of all funds coming into its possession either by appropriation of the governing authorities of the municipality or by gift or by revenue derived from the operation of said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools, and shall have authority to make all contracts in relation to the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-159, 3374-160; Laws, 1946, ch. 258, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 159, 160; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 15; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 24; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 11; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 17; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 14; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 13; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 14; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 13; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 1992).

§ 21-37-39.
Park commission; disposition of revenues.

The park commission of any such municipality shall devote all moneys derived by appropriation from the municipal governing authorities, by gift, by revenue, or from any other source, for the payment of all maintenance and operating expenses, the purchase of parks and playground equipment, the repair and replacement thereof, and for the extension of recreational facilities for the wholesome and healthful recreation of all citizens of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-162; Laws, 1946, ch. 258, § 5; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 162, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-41.
Park commission; construction of certain laws.

Sections 21-37-33 through 21-37-39 shall be liberally construed to promote the efficient maintenance and operation of such parks, playgrounds, and swimming pools to the end that it may result in the improvement of the general health, entertainment and happiness of the citizens of such municipalities. Such sections shall not be compulsory on any municipality, but the governing authorities of any municipality may come under said sections by adopting an ordinance, duly spread on their minutes determining to do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-163; Laws, 1946, ch. 258, § 6; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 163, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-43.
Tax levy for parks and playgrounds.

The governing authorities of any municipality, including any municipality operating under a special charter which has created a park commission, are hereby authorized to levy and collect not more than two mills annually for the purpose of constructing, supporting and maintaining parks and playgrounds, and for recreational purposes in such municipalities. The funds so collected by said tax shall be used for no purpose except as provided in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-164; Laws, 1946, ch. 288; Laws, 1948, ch. 388; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 164, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-45.
Insuring of municipal property.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to insure municipal property, including buildings, furniture, books and records, and all other property, against loss by fire and tornado, and to carry such amount of employer’s liability, steam boilers, plate glass and other miscellaneous casualty insurance as in the discretion of the governing authorities of the municipality may be deemed proper, and to pay for the premiums thereof out of the municipal treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2443; 1942, § 3374-151; Laws, 1930, ch. 43; Laws, 1938, ch. 330; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 151, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-47.
Exercise of eminent domain by municipalities.

The governing authorities of municipalities, and any commission created under legislative act and operating as an agency of any municipality, where necessary or incidental to the functions and purposes of the commission as set out in the legislative act providing for such commission, shall have the power to exercise the right of eminent domain for the following purposes:

1. the laying out of streets, avenues and alleys:

2. the straightening and widening of streets, or changing the grade thereof;

3. the constructing or repairing of sidewalks, sewers, and other improvements;

4. the securing of land for parks, cemeteries, schoolhouses, fire departments, market houses, and for the constructing of any public building;

5. the laying out, constructing, erecting or perfecting of levees, or a system of levees, for the protection of such municipality or any part thereof, or for the protection of any public work or building, and for the constructing or perfecting of its drainage system;

6. the establishing, altering and changing of the channel of streams or water courses or ditches, and the acquiring of land to bridge the same;

7. and in any other case where the land is to be used for public purposes.

Such governing authorities or commission may exercise the right without, as well as within, the corporate limits of the municipality, and this right may be exercised by any municipality or any such commission aforesaid.

Moreover, any municipality in the state may, in the furtherance of any national defense project, within or without its corporate limits but located within ten miles of the corporate limits of such municipality, purchase or acquire lands connected with such project and in so doing exercise the right of eminent domain, if necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2946; 1906, § 3337; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5834; 1930, § 2413; 1942, §§ 3374-128, 4127; Laws, 1897, ch. 27; Laws, 1916, ch. 224; Laws, 1942, ch. 171; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 128; Laws, 1958, ch. 523.

§ 21-37-49.
Purchase of lands sold to state.

The mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, of any municipality in this state are hereby authorized to purchase from the state any lands situated within the corporate limits of such municipality which have been sold to the state for delinquent taxes and the title to which, at the time of the filing of the application to purchase, has matured in the state. The land commissioner, with the approval of the governor, may sell any such lands situated within the corporate limits of such municipality to the municipality at such price as may be authorized by law for the sale of such lands to individuals. Such sale may be made upon the same terms and conditions as are provided by law for the sale of lands to individuals. The mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, of such municipality are hereby authorized to appropriate money out of the general fund of such municipality for the payment of the purchase price of such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4086; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 21-37-51.
Surveys and maps.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to have a survey and map made of the streets, blocks and lots. When corrected and approved by such municipal authorities, the map so made shall constitute the official map of the municipality, and a duplicate thereof shall be recorded in the office of the chancery clerk of the county, in the manner prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3349; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5846; 1930, § 2425; 1942, § 3374-138; Laws, 1898, ch. 42; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 138, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-37-53.
Disposal of certain property not purchased with public funds by certain municipalities.

Any municipality which holds title to property, real, personal, or mixed, which was not purchased with public funds, and which is not used for governmental purposes, but is occupied and used by an industry engaged in manufacturing, may contract privately with the occupant thereof with regard thereto, and may convey and dispose of the same at private sale to such person, firm or corporation so occupying and using the same at and for such consideration as the governing authorities may deem proper under the circumstances.

Any municipality which holds title to property, real, personal, or mixed, which was not purchased with public funds and which is not used for governmental purposes, is hereby authorized to lease same at and for such consideration as the governing authorities may deem proper for a period or periods not to exceed seventy-five years, and may contract with private individuals, firms, or corporations with respect to the use and development thereof.

Any municipality of this state, in or near which a state university, or other state supported four-year college, is now or may hereafter be located, which owns a museum, the property on which it is situated, and/or other property, all of which was acquired by donation or without the use of public funds, may, in the discretion of its governing authorities, convey by gift or otherwise such museum and such property, or any part of it, to such state university, or other state supported four-year college, located in or near such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2923; 1906, § 3314; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5811; 1930, § 2391; 1942, § 3374-112; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 112; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess., ch. 13, § 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 425; Laws, 1966, ch. 592, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).

§ 21-37-55.
Conveyance of land in slum, blighted or urban renewal areas to urban renewal agencies by certain municipalities.

A municipality with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more according to the latest federal decennial census, may convey to its urban renewal agency, for a nominal price, land in a slum area, blighted area or urban renewal area to which it holds title.

As used in this section:

“Urban renewal agency” means an urban renewal agency created under Section 43-35-33.

“Slum area,” “blighted area” and “urban renewal area” have the meaning ascribed to such terms in Section 43-35-3.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 21-37-57.
Pascagoula Public Beach renamed “Buffett Beach.”

The Pascagoula Public Beach located in Pascagoula, Jackson County, Mississippi, and which serves as one of the many coastal tourists attractions in the State of Mississippi, shall be renamed “Buffett Beach” in honor and in recognition of Pascagoula native and musical icon, James William “Jimmy” Buffett, who lived blocks away and played on its shores. The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place adjacent to the beach’s entrance, that states the background, accomplishments and contributions to the state by James William “Jimmy” Buffett. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall erect or cause to be erected proper signage at the beach’s easternmost, centermost and westernmost access entrances displaying the official name of the beach as “Buffett Beach.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 442, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.